Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF984.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; GEORGE STOPPEL HISTORIC SITE.new text end new text begin $3,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the Minnesota Historical Society for one or more grants to the Olmsted County Historical Society. Of this amount, $850,000 is to rehabilitate the historic George Stoppel stone house and barn and to construct an accessible pathway to the farmstead, a property that is listed on the National Register of Historic Places and owned by the Olmsted County Historical Society. $2,150,000 of this amount is to design and construct renovations to the History Center of Olmsted County in Rochester. All work must follow the standards outlined in the U.S. Secretary of the Interior's Treatment of Historic Properties. This appropriation is onetime and is available until the projects are completed or abandoned, subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.642. new text end